District of Columbia statutes.
4-502

Establishment of a Crime Victims Compensation Program.

There is established a Crime Victims Compensation Program (“Program”) that shall administer all funds from all sources for the purpose of investigating and, where appropriate, compensating the claims of victims of violent crime in the District of Columbia.

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-243, § 3, 44 DCR 1142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-422.

Emergency Legislation

See note to § 4-501.
For temporary (90 day) enactment, see § 3022 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) enactment of section, see § 3022 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) enactment, see § 3022 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).

Short Title

Short title: Section 3021 of D.C. Law 16-192 provided that subtitle B of title III of the act may be cited as the “Victims of Domestic Violence Grant-Making Act of 2006”.

Editor's Notes

Grant-making authority for assisting domestic violence victims: Section 3022 of D.C. Law 16-192 provided: “Beginning in fiscal year 2007, the Mayor is authorized to issue grants from local funds received for the Office of Victim Services to assist victims of domestic violence.”